src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON Pick__n_nt 
+N+Neu: PL-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Neu: PL-ACCs/DATs/GENs/NOMs ;
+N+Neu: SG-ACC/DAT/GEN/GENs/NOM ;

LEXICON Pl/an__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe/GENes ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Pot__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCs/DATs/GENs/NOMs ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GEN/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe/GENes ;

LEXICON P/ott__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe/GENes ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Rasse__n_f 
+N+Fem: PL-ACCn/DATn/GENn/NOMn ;
+N+Fem: SG-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;
+N: 0n-PL-CMP-L ;

LEXICON R/aum__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe/GENes ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Real__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCes/DATes/GENes/NOMes ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENes/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe ;

LEXICON Reis__n_nt 
+N+Neu: PL-ACCe/DATen/GENe/NOMe ;
+N+Neu: PL-ACCer/DATern/GENer/NOMer ;
+N+Neu: SG-ACC/DAT/GENes/NOM ;
+N+Neu+Use/NG: SG-DATe ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Ren__n_nt 
+N+Neu: PL-ACCs/DATs/GENs/NOMs ;
+N+Neu: PL-ACCe/DATe/GENe/NOMe ;
+N+Neu: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;

LEXICON Ren__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCes/DATes/GENes/NOMes ;

LEXICON R/ock__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCs/DATs/GENs/NOMs ;
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe/GENes ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Rollst/uhl__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Rückg/ang__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;

LEXICON Rucks/ack__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON R/umpf__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENes/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON S/aft__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENes/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Same__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCn/DATn/GENn/NOMn ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACCn/DATn/GENn/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-GENns ;

LEXICON S/and__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCe/DATen/GENe/NOMe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENes/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Sandwich__n_nt 
+N+Neu: PL-ACCe/DATe/GENe/NOMe ;
+N+Neu: PL-ACCes/DATes/GENes/NOMes ;
+N+Neu: SG-ACC/DAT/GENes/GEN/GENs/NOM ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON S/arg__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENes/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON S/attel__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQ/DATQn/GENQ/NOMQ ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON S/au__n_f 
+N+Fem: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Fem: SG-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Sch/acht__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENes/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Schema__n_nt 
+N+Neu: PL-ACCta/DATta/GENta/NOMta ;
+N+Neu: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;

LEXICON Schi__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCer/DATern/GENer/NOMer ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Schl/oss__n_nt 
+N+Neu: PL-ACCQer/DATQern/GENQer/NOMQer ;
+N+Neu: SG-ACC/DAT/GENes/NOM ;
+N+Neu+Use/NG: SG-DATe ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Schl/oß__n_nt 
+N+Neu: PL-ACCQer/DATQern/GENQer/NOMQer ;
+N+Neu: SG-ACC/DAT/GENes/NOM ;
+N+Neu+Use/NG: SG-DATe ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Schl/ot__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCe/DATen/GENe/NOMe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENes/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Schn/abel__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQ/DATQn/GENQ/NOMQ ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Schn/aps__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENes/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Schn/auz__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENes/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Schnurrb/art__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Schn/ur__n_f 
+N+Fem: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Fem: SG-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;

LEXICON Sch/oss__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQer/DATQern/GENQer/NOMQer ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENes/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe ;

LEXICON Schott__n_nt 
+N+Neu: PL-ACCe/DATen/GENe/NOMe ;
+N+Neu: PL-ACCen/GENen/NOMen ;
+N+Neu: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Neu+Use/NG: SG-DATe/GENes ;

LEXICON Schw/ager__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQ/DATQn/GENQ/NOMQ ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;

LEXICON Schw/ur__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENes/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe ;

LEXICON Sergeant__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCen/DATen/GENen/NOMen ;
+N+Msc: PL-ACCs/DATs/GENs/NOMs ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACCen/ACC/DATen/DAT/GENen/GENs/NOM ;

LEXICON Service__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCs/DATs/GENs/NOMs ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Ski__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCer/DATer/GENer/NOMer ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/GEN/NOM ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Sp/aß__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENes/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON St/ahl__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCe/DATen/GENe/NOMe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe/GENes ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Stewarde/ß__n_f
!-- ß = ss --><!-- ß = ss -->
+N+Fem: PL-ACCen/DATen/GENen/NOMen ;
+N+Fem: SG-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;

LEXICON St/orch__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENes/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe ;

LEXICON Str/auch__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQer/DATQern/GENQer/NOMQer ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENes/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Str/auß__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCe/DATen/GENe/NOMe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENes/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe ;

LEXICON Streith/ahn__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;

LEXICON Str/om__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe/GENes ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON St/uhl__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe/GENes ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON St/umpf__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENes/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe ;

LEXICON St/utz__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENes/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe ;

LEXICON S/ucht__n_f 
+N+Fem: PL-ACCen/DATen/GENen/NOMen ;
+N+Fem: PL-ACCQe/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Fem: SG-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Fem+Use/NG: PL-DATQen ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Ten/or__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON T/ochter__n_f 
+N+Fem: PL-ACCQ/DATQn/GENQ/NOMQ ;
+N+Fem: SG-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON T/on__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe/GENes ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Tr/am__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCe/DATen/GENe/NOMe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENes/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Tr/umm__n_nt 
+N+Neu: PL-ACCQer/DATQern/GENQer/NOMQer ;
+N+Neu: SG-ACC/DAT/GENes/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Neu+Use/NG: SG-DATe ;

LEXICON Tr/unk__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe/GENes ;

LEXICON Unix__n_nt 
+N+Neu: PL-ACCe/DATe/GENe/NOMe ;
+N+Neu: SG-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON V/ogel__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQ/DATQn/GENQ/NOMQ ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON V/ogt__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe/GENes ;

LEXICON V/olk__n_nt 
+N+Neu: PL-ACCQer/DATQern/GENQer/NOMQer ;
+N+Neu: SG-ACC/DAT/GENes/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Neu+Use/NG: SG-DATe ;
+N: 0s-SG-CMP-L ;
+N: Qer-PL-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Vorsch/ub__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
