src/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON Nouns 
Rasse:Rasse Rasse__n_f ;
Tochter:Tochter T/ochter__n_f ;
Stieftochter:Stieftochter T/ochter__n_f ;
Enkeltochter:Enkeltochter T/ochter__n_f ;
Schnur:Schnur Schn/ur__n_f ;
Nabelschnur:Nabelschnur Schn/ur__n_f ;
Sucht:Sucht S/ucht__n_f ;
Sau:Sau S/au__n_f ;
Stewardeß:Stewardeß Stewarde/ß__n_f ;
Vorschub:Vorschub Vorsch/ub__n_m ;
Sand:Sand S/and__n_m ;
Treibsand:Treibsand S/and__n_m ;
Service:Service Service__n_m ;
Same:Same Same__n_m ;
Rumpf:Rumpf R/umpf__n_m ;
Sumpf:Sumpf R/umpf__n_m ;
Trumpf:Trumpf R/umpf__n_m ;
Strumpf:Strumpf R/umpf__n_m ;
Weihnachtsstrumpf:Weihnachtsstrumpf R/umpf__n_m ;
Stumpf:Stumpf St/umpf__n_m ;
Rückgang:Rückgang Rückg/ang__n_m ;
Übergang:Übergang Rückg/ang__n_m ;
Vorrang:Vorrang Rückg/ang__n_m ;
Sarg:Sarg S/arg__n_m ;
Storch:Storch St/orch__n_m ;
Strauch:Strauch Str/auch__n_m ;
Brombeerstrauch:Brombeerstrauch Str/auch__n_m ;
Schi:Schi Schi__n_m ;
Ski:Ski Ski__n_m ;
Rucksack:Rucksack Rucks/ack__n_m ;
Rock:Rock R/ock__n_m ;
Minirock:Minirock R/ock__n_m ;
Morgenrock:Morgenrock R/ock__n_m ;
Damenrock:Damenrock R/ock__n_m ;
Schottenrock:Schottenrock R/ock__n_m ;
Unterrock:Unterrock R/ock__n_m ;
Trunk:Trunk Tr/unk__n_m ;
Real:Real Real__n_m ;
Schnabel:Schnabel Schn/abel__n_m ;
Grünschnabel:Grünschnabel Schn/abel__n_m ;
Vogel:Vogel V/ogel__n_m ;
Seevogel:Seevogel V/ogel__n_m ;
Singvogel:Singvogel V/ogel__n_m ;
Donnervogel:Donnervogel V/ogel__n_m ;
Wasservogel:Wasservogel V/ogel__n_m ;
Watvogel:Watvogel V/ogel__n_m ;
Sattel:Sattel S/attel__n_m ;
Fahrradsattel:Fahrradsattel S/attel__n_m ;
Stahl:Stahl St/ahl__n_m ;
Edelstahl:Edelstahl St/ahl__n_m ;
Stuhl:Stuhl St/uhl__n_m ;
Liegestuhl:Liegestuhl St/uhl__n_m ;
Hochstuhl:Hochstuhl St/uhl__n_m ;
Lehnstuhl:Lehnstuhl St/uhl__n_m ;
Fahrstuhl:Fahrstuhl St/uhl__n_m ;
Lehrstuhl:Lehrstuhl St/uhl__n_m ;
Rollstuhl:Rollstuhl Rollst/uhl__n_m ;
Tram:Tram Tr/am__n_m ;
Strom:Strom Str/om__n_m ;
Apfelbaum:Apfelbaum R/aum__n_m ;
Tamarindenbaum:Tamarindenbaum R/aum__n_m ;
Birnbaum:Birnbaum R/aum__n_m ;
Lebensbaum:Lebensbaum R/aum__n_m ;
Christbaum:Christbaum R/aum__n_m ;
Fahrradraum:Fahrradraum R/aum__n_m ;
Warteraum:Warteraum R/aum__n_m ;
Hohlraum:Hohlraum R/aum__n_m ;
Kofferraum:Kofferraum R/aum__n_m ;
Aufenthaltsraum:Aufenthaltsraum R/aum__n_m ;
Weltraum:Weltraum R/aum__n_m ;
Plan:Plan Pl/an__n_m ;
Flugplan:Flugplan Pl/an__n_m ;
Stundenplan:Stundenplan Pl/an__n_m ;
Terminplan:Terminplan Pl/an__n_m ;
Fahrplan:Fahrplan Pl/an__n_m ;
Lehrplan:Lehrplan Pl/an__n_m ;
Stadtplan:Stadtplan Pl/an__n_m ;
Zeitplan:Zeitplan Pl/an__n_m ;
Schwan:Schwan Pl/an__n_m ;
Ren:Ren Ren__n_m ;
Streithahn:Streithahn Streith/ahn__n_m ;
Ton:Ton T/on__n_m ;
Schwager:Schwager Schw/ager__n_m ;
Tenor:Tenor Ten/or__n_m ;
Schwur:Schwur Schw/ur__n_m ;
Schnaps:Schnaps Schn/aps__n_m ;
Schoss:Schoss Sch/oss__n_m ;
Schaft:Schaft S/aft__n_m ;
Apfelsaft:Apfelsaft S/aft__n_m ;
Traubensaft:Traubensaft S/aft__n_m ;
Orangensaft:Orangensaft S/aft__n_m ;
Apfelsinensaft:Apfelsinensaft S/aft__n_m ;
Pampelmusensaft:Pampelmusensaft S/aft__n_m ;
Tomatensaft:Tomatensaft S/aft__n_m ;
Hustensaft:Hustensaft S/aft__n_m ;
Johannisbeersaft:Johannisbeersaft S/aft__n_m ;
Ananassaft:Ananassaft S/aft__n_m ;
Grapefruitsaft:Grapefruitsaft S/aft__n_m ;
Vogt:Vogt V/ogt__n_m ;
Schacht:Schacht Sch/acht__n_m ;
Sergeant:Sergeant Sergeant__n_m ;
Polizeisergeant:Polizeisergeant Sergeant__n_m ;
Schlot:Schlot Schl/ot__n_m ;
Pot:Pot Pot__n_m ;
Stoppelbart:Stoppelbart Schnurrb/art__n_m ;
Backenbart:Backenbart Schnurrb/art__n_m ;
Schnurrbart:Schnurrbart Schnurrb/art__n_m ;
Pott:Pott P/ott__n_m ;
Stutz:Stutz St/utz__n_m ;
Schnauz:Schnauz Schn/auz__n_m ;
Spaß:Spaß Sp/aß__n_m ;
Strauß:Strauß Str/auß__n_m ;
Blumenstrauß:Blumenstrauß Str/auß__n_m ;
Schema:Schema Schema__n_nt ;
Sandwich:Sandwich Sandwich__n_nt ;
Pick:Pick Pick__n_nt ;
Pik:Pik Pick__n_nt ;
Stelldichein:Stelldichein Pick__n_nt ;
Volk:Volk V/olk__n_nt ;
Trumm:Trumm Tr/umm__n_nt ;
Ren:Ren Ren__n_nt ;
Reis:Reis Reis__n_nt ;
Floss:Floss Schl/oss__n_nt ;
Schloss:Schloss Schl/oss__n_nt ;
Vorhängeschloss:Vorhängeschloss Schl/oss__n_nt ;
Schott:Schott Schott__n_nt ;
Unix:Unix Unix__n_nt ;
Schloß:Schloß Schl/oß__n_nt ;
